Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-308 Judicial appointment of
guardian; presence and rights at hearing. (a) Unless excused by the court
for good cause, the proposed guardian shall attend the hearing. The respondent
shall attend and participate in the hearing, unless excused by the court for
good cause. The respondent may present evidence and subpoena witnesses and
documents, examine witnesses, including any court-appointed physician,
psychologist, or other individual qualified to evaluate the alleged impairment,
and the kokua kanawai, and otherwise participate in the hearing. The hearing
may be held in a location convenient to the respondent and may be closed upon
the request of the respondent and a showing of good cause.

(b) Any person may request permission to
participate in the proceeding. The court may grant the request, with or
without hearing, upon determining that the best interest of the respondent will
be served. The court may attach appropriate conditions to the participation.
[L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next